src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON s33 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ rógva
               :gv        inf                ;
               :gv        pres_strong_s1     ;
               :%^IUML    pres_strong_s23_t1 ;
               :gv        pres_pl            ;
                          prt_ð              ;
               :gv        imp_prsptc         ;
                          sup_in             ;
                          p32                ;


LEXICON s34 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ goyggja
               :ggj inf        ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:ggi #       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:rt  #       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:r   #       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:r   #       ;
               :ggj pres_pl    ;
                    prt_ð      ;
               :ggj imp_prsptc ;
         +V+Sup:%>ð #       ;




!! !!Strong verbs starting here
! ==========================

LEXICON s35 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ bíta
                     inf        ;
                     pres_ur    ;
          :%^AB1     prt_null_s ;
          :%^AB2     prt_u_p    ;
                     imp_prsptc ;
          :%^VSH     sup_null   ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%^VSH%>in #       ;
                     p26        ;

LEXICON s36 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ svíkja
          :        jinf       ;
                   pres_ur_j2 ;
          :%^AB1   prt_null_s ;
          :%^AB2   prt_u_p    ;
          :        imp        ;
          :j       prsptc     ;
          :%^VSH   sup_null   ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%^VSHin p26        ;


LEXICON s37 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ bróta
        inf             ;
        pres_strong_s1  ;
 :%^AB7 pres_strong_s23 ;
 :%^AB1 prt_null_s      ;
 :%^AB4 prt_u_p         ;
        imp_prsptc      ;
 :%^AB5 sup_ið_in       ;
        p26             ;

LEXICON s38 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ skjóta present tense
  :jót inf             ;
  :jót pres_strong_s1  ;
  :jýt pres_strong_s23 ;
  :eyt prt_null_s      ;
  :ut  prt_u_p         ;
  :jót imp_prsptc      ;
  :ot  sup_ið_in       ;
       p26             ;

!LEXICON s39/30
! :jóð s30             ; ! weak infl + common forms
!      s39             ; ! umlauted forms, XXX check.

LEXICON s39d ! bjóða
!! __@LEXNAME@__
          :jóð   inf             ;
          :jóð   pres_strong_s1  ;
          :ýð    pres_strong_s23 ;
          :eyð   prt_null_s      ;
          :uð    prt_u_p         ;
          :jóða  impsg           ;
 +V+Imp+Pl:jóðið #            ;
          :jóð   prsptc          ;
          :oð    sup_ið_in       ;
                 p26             ;

LEXICON s39s ! gjósa
!! __@LEXNAME@__
          :jós   inf             ;
          :jós   pres_strong_s1  ;
          :ýs    pres_strong_s23 ;
          :eys   prt_null_s2     ;
          :us    prt_u_p         ;
          :jósa  impsg           ;
 +V+Imp+Pl:jósið #            ;
          :jós   prsptc          ;
          :os    sup_ið_in       ;
                 p26             ;

LEXICON s39 ! fljóta
!! __@LEXNAME@__ bjóða umlaut forms
          :jót   inf             ;
          :jót   pres_strong_s1  ;
          :ýt    pres_strong_s23 ;
          :eyt   prt_null_s      ;
          :ut    prt_u_p         ;
          :jóta  impsg           ;
 +V+Imp+Pl:jótið #            ;
          :jót   prsptc          ;
          :ot    sup_ið_in       ;
                 p26             ;

LEXICON s40 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ fúka
          inf             ;
          pres_strong_s1  ;
  :%^IUML pres_strong_s23 ;
! :%^IUML pres_ur         ;
  :%^AB1  prt_null_s      ;
  :%^AB4  prt_u_p         ;
          imp_prsptc      ;
  :%^AB5  sup_ið_in       ;
          p26             ;

LEXICON s41 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ flúgva
               inf             ;
               pres_strong_s1  ;
 :%^IUML%^VDEL pres_strong_s23 ;
 :%^AB1%^VDEL  prt_null_s      ;
 :%^VSH%^VDEL  prt_u_p         ;
               imp_prsptc      ;
 :%^AB5%^VDEL  sup_ið_in       ;
               p26             ;

LEXICON s42 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ klúgva
               inf             ;
               pres_strong_s1  ;
 :%^IUML%^GDEL pres_strong_s23 ;
 :%^AB1%^GDEL  prt_null_s      ;
 :%^VSH%^GDEL  prt_u_p         ;
               imp_prsptc      ;
 :%^AB5%^GDEL  sup_ið_in       ;
               p26             ;

LEXICON s44 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ finna
        inf        ;
        pres_ur    ;
 :%^AB3 prt_null_s ;
 :%^AB4 prt_u_p    ;
        imp_prsptc ;
 :%^AB4 sup_ið_in  ;
        p26        ;

LEXICON s45 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ binda
 :d        inf        ;
 :d        pres_ur    ;
 :t%^aAB   prt_null_s ;
 :%^AB4%>d prt_u_p    ;
 :d        imp_prsptc ;
 :%^AB4%>d sup_ið_in  ;
 :d        p26        ;

LEXICON s46 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ stinga
              inf        ;
              pres_ur    ;
 :%^NGKK%^aAB prt_null_s ;
 :%^AB4       prt_u_p    ;
              imp_prsptc ;
 :%^NGKK      imp	     ;
 :%^AB4       sup_ið_in  ;
              p26        ;

LEXICON s47 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ svimja
           :imj     inf        ;
           :im      pres_ur_j  ;
           :am      prt_null_s ;
           :um      prt_u_p    ;
           :im      impsg      ;
           :imj		imppl_j	   ;
           :imj		prsptc	   ;
           :om      sup_ið_in  ;
  		   :omin  	p26        ;

!LEXICON s47 ! svimja
!                   inf        ;
!                   pres_ur    ;
!          :%^aAB   prt_null_s ;
!          :%^AB4   prt_u_p    ;
!                   imp_prsptc ;
!          :%^oAB   sup_null   ;
! +V+PrfPrc:%^oABin p26        ;

LEXICON s48 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ drekka
                 inf        ;
                 pres_ur    ;
          :%^AB3 prt_null_s ;
          :%^AB4 prt_u_p    ;
                 imp_prsptc ;
          :%^AB4 sup_ið_in  ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%>in  p26        ;

LEXICON s49 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ detta
                   inf        ;
                   pres_ur    ;
          :%^AB3   prt_null_s ;
          :%^AB4   prt_u_p    ;
                   imp_prsptc ;
          :%^AB5   sup_ið_in  ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%^AB5in p26        ;

LEXICON s50 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ røkka
                   inf        ;
                   pres_ur    ;
          :%^AB3   prt_null_s ;
          :        prt_null_s ;
          :%^AB4   prt_u_p    ;
                   imp_prsptc ;
          :%^AB5   sup_ið_in  ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%^AB5in p26        ;

LEXICON s51 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ ganga
          :ang     inf             ;
          :ang     pres_strong_s1  ;
          :ong     pres_strong_s23 ; !2?
          :ekk     prt_null_s      ;
          :ing     prt_u_p         ;
          :akk	   impsg		   ;
          :ang     imp_prsptc      ;
          :ing     sup_ið_in       ;
 +V+PrfPrc:ing%>in p26             ;


LEXICON s52 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ veva
                   inf        ;
                   pres_ur    ;
          :%^AB3   prt_null_s ;
          :%^AB2   prt_u_p    ;
                   imp_prsptc ;
          :%^AB5   sup_ið_in  ;
 +V+PrfPrc:%^AB5in p26        ;

LEXICON s53 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ leypa
          :leyp  inf             ;
          :leyp  pres_strong_s1  ;
          :loyp  pres_strong_s23 ;
          :leyp  prt_null_s      ;
          :leyp  imp_prsptc      ;
          :lup   prt_u_p         ;
          :lop   sup_ið_in       ;
 +V+PrfPrc:lopin p26             ;

LEXICON s54 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ bera
                   		 inf                ;
                   		 pres_strong_s1     ;
                   		 pres_strong_s23_t0 ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%> 	 #			    ;
          		:%^AB3   prt_null_s2        ;
         		:%^AB2   prt_u_p            ;
                	     imp_prsptc         ;
          		:%^AB5   sup_ið_in          ;
	 			:%^AB5in p26                ;

LEXICON s55 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ fara
                  		inf                ;
                  		pres_strong_s1     ;
          		:%^IUML pres_strong_s23_t0 ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%^IUML #   			   ;
          		:%^AB3  prt_null_s2        ;
  		        :%^AB3  prt_u_p            ;
                  		sup_ið_in          ;
                  		imp_prsptc         ;
 				:%>in   p26                ;
