src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
støvsúgva:støv#súgv s41 ;
fyriganga:fyri#g s51 ;
forskjóta:for#sk s38 ;
kondirenna:kondirenn s48 ;
blíva:blív s35 ;
trælabinda:træla#bin s45 ;
svínabinda:svína#bin s45 ;
skuldbinda:skuld#bin s45 ;
hugbinda:hug#bin s45 ;
bakbinda:bak#bin s45 ;
málbinda:mál#bin s45 ;
múlbinda:múl#bin s45 ;
jarnbinda:jarn#bin s45 ;
grasbinda:gras#bin s45 ;
sperrubinda:sperru#bin s45 ;
hábinda:há#bin s45 ;
staðbinda:stað#bin s45 ;
ganga:g s51 ;
helganga:hel#g s51 ;
kollganga:koll#g s51 ;
innganga:inn#g s51 ;
kappganga:kapp#g s51 ;
forganga:for#g s51 ;
viðurganga:viður#g s51 ;
ovganga:ov#g s51 ;
tráganga:trá#g s51 ;
fríganga:frí#g s51 ;
hanga:h s51 ;
springa:spring s46 ;
stinga:sting s46 ;
meinstinga:mein#sting s46 ;
undirstinga:undir#sting s46 ;
mønustinga:mønu#sting s46 ;
níga:níg s35 ;
misstíga:misstíg s35 ;
doyggja:doy s34 ;
rakdoyggja:rakdoy s34 ;
steindoyggja:steindoy s34 ;
sjálvdoyggja:sjálvdoy s34 ;
strádoyggja:strádoy s34 ;
bráðdoyggja:bráðdoy s34 ;
goyggja:goy s34 ;
spýggja:spý s34 ;
svíkja:svík s36 ;
svimja:sv s47 ;
grulvisvimja:grulvi#sv s47 ;
kappsvimja:kapp#sv s47 ;
drekka:drekk s48 ;
kappdrekka:kappdrekk s48 ;
grúvudrekka:grúvudrekk s48 ;
ovdrekka:ovdrekk s48 ;
røkka:røkk s50 ;
søkka:søkk s50 ;
steinsøkka:steinsøkk s50 ;
støkka:støkk s50 ;
hvøkka:hvøkk s50 ;
fúka:fúk s40 ;
húka:húk s40 ;
rúka:rúk s40 ;
strúka:strúk s40 ;
svølla:svøll s50 ;
sokna:sokn s50 ;
kringrenna:kringrenn s48 ;
steinrenna:steinrenn s48 ;
vatnrenna:vatnrenn s48 ;
kapprenna:kapprenn s48 ;
hálvrenna:hálvrenn s48 ;
ovrenna:ovrenn s48 ;
finna:finn s44 ;
uppfinna:upp#finn s44 ;
frífinna:frí#finn s44 ;
spinna:spinn s44 ;
vinna:vinn s44 ;
yvirvinna:yvir#vinn s44 ;
forvinna:for#vinn s44 ;
endurvinna:endur#vinn s44 ;
svinna:svinn s44 ;
útvinna:út#vinn s44 ;
rína:rín s35 ;
órína:órín s35 ;
gleppa:glepp s49 ;
sleppa:slepp s49 ;
verpa:verp s49 ;
leypa: s53 ;
skammleypa:skamm s53 ;
sporleypa:spor s53 ;
stórleypa:stór s53 ;
stáleypa:stá s53 ;
tvíleypa:tví s53 ;
orðleypa:orð s53 ;
sporðleypa:sporð s53 ;
stóðleypa:stóð s53 ;
støleypa:stø s53 ;
drúpa:drúp s40 ;
krúpa:krúp s40 ;
súpa:súp s40 ;
kappsúpa:kapp#súp s40 ;
ovsúpa:ov#súp s40 ;
fara:far s55 ;
endafara:endafar s55 ;
geislafara:geislafar s55 ;
handfara:handfar s55 ;
hundfara:hundfar s55 ;
hugfara:hugfar s55 ;
eygfara:eygfar s55 ;
málfara:málfar s55 ;
skammfara:skammfar s55 ;
granskufara:granskufar s55 ;
ovfara:ovfar s55 ;
moldbera:moldber s54 ;
eygbera:eygber s54 ;
sambera:samber s54 ;
samanbera:samanber s54 ;
jarnbera:jarnber s54 ;
kappbera:kappber s54 ;
tvørbera:tvørber s54 ;
skriftbera:skriftber s54 ;
tøðbera:tøðber s54 ;
kílaskera:kílasker s54 ;
ráskera:rásker s54 ;
gjósa:g s39s ;
njósa:n s39s ;
nerta:nert s49 ;
detta:dett s49 ;
bíta:bít s35 ;
rótbíta:rótbít s35 ;
forlíta:forlít s35 ;
skjóta:sk s38 ;
lamskjóta:lam#sk s38 ;
steinskjóta:stein#sk s38 ;
kappskjóta:kapp#sk s38 ;
ørskjóta:ør#sk s38 ;
knæskjóta:knæ#sk s38 ;
njóta:njót s39 ;
flóta:flót s37 ;
bróta:brót s37 ;
ryggbróta:ryggbrót s37 ;
beinbróta:beinbrót s37 ;
grunnbróta:grunnbrót s37 ;
tvørbróta:tvørbrót s37 ;
kjaftbróta:kjaftbrót s37 ;
skortbróta:skortbrót s37 ;
neyðbróta:neyðbrót s37 ;
veva:vev s52 ;
rógva:ró s33 ;
andrógva:and#ró s33 ;
grógva:gró s33 ;
grasgrógva:gras#gró s33 ;
kapprógva:kapp#ró s33 ;
bátsrógva:báts#ró s33 ;
ovrógva:ov#ró s33 ;
deyðrógva:deyð#ró s33 ;
flúgva:flúgv s41 ;
royndarflúgva:royndar#flúgv s41 ;
klúgva:klúgv s42 ;
krossklúgva:kross#klúgv s42 ;
smúgva:smúgv s41 ;
súgva:súgv s41 ;
mergsúgva:merg#súgv s41 ;
turrsúgva:turr#súgv s41 ;
dustsúgva:dust#súgv s41 ;
máttsúgva:mátt#súgv s41 ;
trásúgva:trá#súgv s41 ;
skelva:skelv s49 ;
ríva:rív s35 ;
tríva:trív s35 ;
ríða:ríð s35 ;
innsjóða:inn#s s39d ;
bjóða:b s39d ;
forbjóða:for#b s39d ;
gretta:gr s49 ;
hugnema:hugnem s49 ;
hugnema:hugnem s52 ;
javnbjóða:javn#b s39d ;
kjósa:k s39s ;
kvetta:kvett s49 ;
kvøtta:kvøtt s49 ;
løgbjóða:løg#b s39d ;
lúka:lúk s40 ;
meinbjóða:mein#b s39d ;
misbjóða:mis#b s39d ;
nema:nem s49 ;
nema:nem s52 ;
riða:rið s35 ;
sølubjóða:sølu#b s39d ;
vanbjóða:van#b s39d ;
viðvíkja:við#vík s36 ;
víkja:vík s36 ;
yvirbjóða:yvir#b s39d ;
forsvinna:forsvinn s44 ;
bresta:brest s49 ;
innibera:inni#ber s54 ;
